District of Columbia statutes.
21-2114

Construction of power relating to benefits from social security, medicare, medicaid, or other governmental programs, or military service.

In a statutory power of attorney the language granting power with respect to benefits from social security, medicare, medicaid or other governmental programs, or civil or military service empowers the agent to:

(1)

Execute vouchers in the name of the principal for allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign government or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described in section 21-2113(1) [§ 21-2113(a)(1)], and for shipment of their household effects;

(2)

Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal from a post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place of storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private, and execute and deliver a release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument for that purpose;

(3)

Prepare, file, and prosecute a claim of the principal to a benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal claims to be entitled, under a statute or governmental regulation;

(4)

Prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to any benefits the principal may be entitled to receive; and

(5)

Receive the financial proceeds of a claim of the type described in this section, conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for a lawful purpose.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2114.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.